North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-22 Soil Conservation Districts Law [Repealed]

4-22-01.
Policy and scope of chapter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 4-2201; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-2202; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 1; 1973, ch. 120, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1997, ch. 50, § 27; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-03.
State soil conservation committee — Elective and appointive members — Records and seal. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 4, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 4-2203; S.L. 1951, ch. 99, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 4-2203; S.L. 1961, ch. 103, § 1; 1967, ch. 74, § 9; 1971, ch. 94, § 2; 1981, ch. 95, § 1; 1997, ch. 50, § 28; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-04.
Committee — Chairman — Quorum — Compensation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 4, subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 4-2204; S.L. 1955, ch. 94, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 4-2204; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 3; 1977, ch. 56, § 1; 1981, ch. 95, § 2; 1997, ch. 50, § 29; 2003, ch. 58, § 1; 2009, ch. 72, §
14; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-05.
Employees — Legal services — Offices — State departments to cooperate with committee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 50, § 35.

4-22-06.
Duties and powers generally. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 4, subs. d; R.C. 1943, § 4-2206; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 4; 1975, ch. 58, § 1; 1997, ch. 50, § 30; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-06.1.
Soil conservation — Duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 50, § 31; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-07.
Committee to make rules governing notices, hearings, and referenda. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 25.

4-22-08.
Districts — Petition — Contents — More than one petition filed. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 5, subs. a; 1939, ch. 6, § 1, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 4-2208; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-09.
Hearings on petitions — When held — Notice — Determinations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 5, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 4–2209; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-10.
Referendum — When held — Contents of ballot — Who may vote. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 5, subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 4-2210; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-11.
Publication of referendum results — Determination of practicability of operation of district. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 5, subs. e; R.C. 1943, § 4-2211; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-12.
District determined practicable — Statement filed with secretary of state. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 5, subs. f; 1939, ch. 6, § 1, subs. f; R.C. 1943, § 4-2212; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-13.
District to be subdivision of state — Boundaries of district. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 5, subs. f; 1939, ch. 6, § 1, subs. f; R.C. 1943, § 4-2213; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-14.
Petition to include additional territory within existing district. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 5, subs. g; R.C. 1943, § 4-2214; S.L. 1945, ch. 42, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 4-2214; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-15.
Districts presumed to be organized legally — Copy of certificates as evidence. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 5, subs. i; R.C. 1943, § 4-2215; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-16.
Notice to file nominating petitions and of election of district supervisors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 6, subs. a; 1939, ch. 6, § 2, subs. a(1); R.C. 1943, § 4-2216; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-17.
Nominating petitions — Petitions required — Final filing date. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 6, subs. a; 1939, ch. 6, § 2, subs. a(1); R.C. 1943, § 4-2217; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 11; 1973, ch. 58, § 1; 1983, ch. 96, § 1; 1987, ch. 242, § 1; 1997, ch. 68, § 1; 2015, ch. 162, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-18.
Election of supervisors — Payment of expenses — Regulation of elections — Eligibility of voters — Ballots. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 25.

4-22-19.
Election board — Appointment — Oath — Canvass of election. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 25.

4-22-20.
Committee to canvass returns and issue certificates of election. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 25.

4-22-21.
Regular election of district — When held — Regulations governing. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 6, subs. a; 1939, ch. 6, § 2, subs. a(5); R.C. 1943, § 4-2221; S.L. 1945, ch. 45, § 1; 1951, ch. 99, § 2; 1953, ch. 89, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 4-2221; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 12; 1983, ch. 97, § 2; 2011, ch. 152, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-22.
Supervisors — Terms of office — Vacancies — Removal — Compensation — Expenses. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 6, subss. a, c; 1939, ch. 6, § 2, subs. a(4); R.C. 1943, § 4-2222; S.L. 1951, ch. 99, § 3; 1953, ch. 89, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 4-2222; S.L. 1965, ch. 76, § 1; 1971, ch. 94, § 13; 1973, ch. 59, § 1; 1983, ch. 96, § 2; 1987, ch. 89, § 1; 1997, ch. 50, § 32; 1997, ch. 68, § 2; 1997, ch. 69, § 1; 2005, ch. 9, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-22.1.
Additional soil conservation district supervisors. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 25.

4-22-22.2.
Soil conservation district supervisors — Training. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 58, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-23.
Supervisors may employ assistants — Attorney general and state’s attorneys to advise — Reports to committee. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 6, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 4-2223; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-23.1.
Assistance for district supervisors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 95, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-22231; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-24.
Supervisors to provide for surety bonds, keeping records, and annual audit. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 6, subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 4-2224; S.L. 1955, ch. 94, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 4-2224; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-25.
Supervisors may consult representatives of county or municipality. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 6, subs. d; R.C. 1943, § 4-2225; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-26.
Powers and duties of districts and supervisors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 4-2226; S.L. 1965, ch. 76, § 2; 1971, ch. 94, § 15; 1975, ch. 58, § 2; 1983, ch. 97, § 3; 2009, ch. 74, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 7, effective January 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-27.
Supervisors may formulate land use regulations for submission to qualified electors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 8; 1939, ch. 6, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-2227; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 16; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-28.
Notice of referendum — Form of ballot on referendum — Conduct of election — Who may vote. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 8; 1939, ch. 6, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-2228; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 17; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-29.
Majority required to adopt ordinance — Effect of ordinance after adoption. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 8; 1939, ch. 6, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-2229; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 18; 1985, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-30.
What may be contained in land use regulations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 8; 1939, ch. 6, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-2230; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-31.
Regulations to be uniform — Copies furnished in district. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 8; 1939, ch. 6, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-2231; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 19; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-32.
Amending, supplementing, or repealing land use regulations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 8; 1939, ch. 6, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-2232; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 20; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-33.
Supervisors to enforce land use regulations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 9; 1939, ch. 6, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 4-2233; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-34.
Failure to perform land use regulations — Hearing on — Supervisors to perform — Costs and expenses. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 4-2234; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-35.
Board of adjustment — Members — Appointment — Vacancies — Compensation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 11, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 4-2235; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-36.
Board of adjustment — Rules — Chairman — Meetings — Quorum — Records. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 11, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 4-2236; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-37.
Petition to board of adjustment to vary land use regulations — Service — Hearing — Board’s powers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 11, subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 4-2237; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 21; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-38.
Taking of testimony at hearing. [Repealed]

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 4-2238; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-39.
Aggrieved petitioner and supervisors may appeal to district court from order of board — Procedure. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 11, subs. d; R.C. 1943, § 4-2239; S.L. 1989, ch. 83, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-40.
Cooperation between district supervisors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 4-2240; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-41.
State agencies to cooperate with district supervisors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 4-2241; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-42.
Discontinuance of districts — Petition — Referendum — Eligible qualified electors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 14; R.C. 1943, § 4-2242; S.L. 1959, ch. 99, § 1; 1971, ch. 94, § 22; 1985, ch. 235, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-43.
Duties of committee after referendum on discontinuance of the district has been held. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 14; R.C. 1943, § 4-2243; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 23; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-44.
Termination of affairs of district — Disposal of property — Certificate of dissolution. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 14; R.C. 1943, § 4-2244; S.L. 1965, ch. 76, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-45.
Ordinances, regulations, and contracts of districts after dissolution. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 14; R.C. 1943, § 4-2245; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-46.
Petitions for discontinuance of district — Limitation on filing. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 9, § 14; R.C. 1943, § 4-2246; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-47.
Consolidation of districts — Petition — Referendum — Conduct of referendum. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 90, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-2247; S.L. 1971, ch. 94, § 24; 1997, ch. 50, § 33; 1999, ch. 51, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-48.
Conduct of referendum — Canvass of votes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 90, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-2248; S.L. 1991, ch. 58, § 2; 1997, ch. 50, § 34; 1997, ch. 68, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-49.
Supervisors of consolidated district — Terms of office — Powers and duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 90, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-2249; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-50.
Costs and expenses of consolidation — Disposition of property — Contracts of districts after consolidation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 90, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-2250; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-22-51.
Soil conservation trust lands. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-2251; S.L. 1985, ch. 82, § 2; 1985, ch. 96, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.